Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1600.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 923. Keystone STARS Program.--(a) Each certified child-care provider A CHILD CARE FACILITY PARTICIPATING in the Keystone STARS Program may:(1) Denote on its publicly accessible Internet website, if operational, its designated STAR-level rating, which shall include how many STARS that the certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY has received. <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Provide, in a linguistically appropriate manner, the certified child-care provider's TO A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN AT THE TIME OF THE APPLICATION, THE CHILD CARE FACILITY'S STAR- level rating and the DEPARTMENT'S publicly accessible Internet website of the department that includes information on the Keystone STARS Program in writing to a parent or legal guardian at the time of application . (3) Obtain a department-issued placard that denotes the certified child-care provider's CHILD CARE FACILITY'S participation in the Keystone STARS Program and designated STAR-level rating, which may be displayed in a public-facing location.(b) The department shall be responsible for issuing placards to program participants in conformance with the following:(1) The placards shall be clear, visible, readable and linguistically appropriate.(2) The placards shall include the following information:(i) The name of the certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY . (ii) The name of the department.(iii) The date that the department issued the placard.(iv) The number of STARS that the certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY has received. (v) The address, telephone number, publicly accessible Internet website that includes information on the Keystone STARS Program and e-mail address of the department.(c) The department shall issue guidance that establishes a Keystone STARS rubric which provides a pathway for a certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY that chooses to participate in the Keystone STARS Program to move up a STAR 20250HB1600PN1944 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 level by permitting demonstration of a combination of staff qualifications, work experience and professional development, quality early childhood education program activities, partnerships with families and communities and effective leadership and program management when applying for additional STARS.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Certified child-care provider" means:(1) A child-care center or family child-care home certified or licensed under Article X.(2) A provider certified or "CHILD CARE FACILITY" MEANS A FACILITY licensed to provide child care under Article IX THIS ARTICLE . "Keystone STARS" means the standards, training and professional development, assistance, resources and supports (STARS) used in the Commonwealth's quality rating and improvement system for certified child-care providers CHILD CARE FACILITIES . "STAR" means a level of performance rating for early learning programs participating in the Keystone STARS Program that assesses staff education, learning environment, leadership and management and family and community partnerships.Section 2. Section 1006 of the act is amended to read:Section 1006. Fees.--Annual licenses shall be issued when the proper fee, if required, is received by the department and all the other conditions prescribed in this act are met. For personal care homes, the fee shall be an application fee. The fees shall be:Facility Annual Fee20250HB1600PN1944 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Adult day care center $ 15Mental health establishment 50Personal care home-- 0 - 20 beds 15 -- 21 - 50 beds 20 -- 51 - 100 beds 30 --101 beds and above 50No fee shall be required for the annual license in the case of [day] child care centers, family child care homes, boarding homes for children or for public or nonprofit mental institutions.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1019. Keystone STARS Program.--(a) Each certified child-care provider A CHILD CARE FACILITY in the Keystone STARS Program may:(1) Denote on its publicly accessible Internet website, if operational, its designated STAR-level rating, which shall include how many STARS that the certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY has received. (2) Provide, in a linguistically appropriate manner, TO A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION, the certified child-care provider's CHILD CARE FACILITY'S STAR-level rating and the DEPARTMENT'S publicly accessible Internet website of the department that includes information on the Keystone STARS Program in writing to a parent or legal guardian at the time of application . (3) Obtain a department-issued placard that denotes the certified child-care provider's CHILD CARE FACILITY'S participation in the Keystone STARS Program and designated STAR-level rating, which may be displayed in a public-facing location.20250HB1600PN1944 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) The department shall be responsible for issuing placards to program participants in conformance with the following:(1) The placards shall be clear, visible, readable and linguistically appropriate.(2) The placards shall include the following information: (i) The name of the certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY . (ii) The name of the department. (iii) The date that the department issued the placard. (iv) The number of STARS that the certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY has received. (v) The address, telephone number, publicly accessible Internet website that includes information on the Keystone STARS Program and e-mail address of the department.(c) The department shall issue guidance that establishes a Keystone STARS rubric which provides a pathway for a certified child-care provider CHILD CARE FACILITY that chooses to participate in the Keystone STARS Program to move up a STAR level by permitting appropriate demonstration of a combination of staff qualifications , work experience and professional development, quality early childhood education program activities, partnerships with families and communities and effective leadership and program management when applying for additional STARS.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Certified child-care provider" means:(1) A child-care center or family child-care home certified or licensed under Article X.(2) A provider certified or licensed to provide child care 20250HB1600PN1944 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under Article IX. "CHILD CARE FACILITY" MEANS A CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME LICENSED UNDER THIS ARTICLE."Keystone STARS" means the standards, training and professional development, assistance, resources and supports (STARS) used in the Commonwealth's quality rating and improvement system for certified child-care providers CHILD CARE FACILITIES . "STAR" means a level of performance rating for early learning programs participating in the Keystone STARS Program that assesses staff education, learning environment, leadership and management and family and community partnerships.Section 4. Section 1051 of the act is amended to read:Section 1051. Definition.--As used in this subarticle--"Private institution" means any of the following facilities by whatever term known and irrespective of the age group served: Mental hospital, institution for the mentally defective, [day] child care center, nursing home, hospital, personal care home, assisted living residence and other similar institution which is operated for profit and which requires a license issued by the department.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1600PN1944 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021